Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. General State Policies.

Sec. 44.99.100.
Declaration of state economic development policy.

To further the goals of a sound economy, stable employment, and a desirable quality of life, the legislature declares that the state has a commitment to foster the economy of Alaska through purposeful development of the state’s abundant natural resources and productive capacity. It is the legislature’s intent that this development

offer long-term benefits and increased employment to Alaskans by strengthening and diversifying the state’s economic base and encouraging new activities;

provide opportunities for increased personal income or reduced living costs by creating activity in economic sectors;

have a positive effect on the revenue needs and fiscal conditions of the state and local communities;

be undertaken after consideration of the social and economic views of citizens impacted by the development, and only after adequate protection is assured for Alaska’s environment.

To take advantage of investment opportunities afforded by Alaska’s abundant natural resources and productive capacity, the legislature finds that the state should undertake activities that serve as a catalyst to responsible economic development in the state for the benefit of its citizens. It is the policy of the state to

develop and provide information to domestic and foreign investors to use in evaluating project feasibility;

with cooperation from investors, identify constraints to orderly and beneficial economic development and work with government agencies to eliminate unnecessary impediments to economic development;

with cooperation from investors, identify constraints to economic development that would impede the extraction, production, and transport of resources to markets and manufactured products, and implement capital improvement or other programs to resolve the deficiencies;

provide a stable tax and regulatory climate that encourages expansion of the state’s economic base;

encourage “value-added” processing in the state;

improve the state’s domestic and international competitive position by offering economic incentives that support the constitutional mandates for utilization, development, and conservation of natural resources.

History.

(§ 1 ch 63 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.67.010.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 44.99.105.
Declaration of state Arctic policy.

It is the policy of the state, as it relates to the Arctic, to

uphold the state’s commitment to economically vibrant communities sustained by development activities consistent with the state’s responsibility for a healthy environment, including efforts to

ensure that Arctic residents and communities benefit from economic and resource development activities in the region;

improve the efficiency, predictability, and stability of permitting and regulatory processes;

attract investment through the establishment of a positive investment climate and the development of strategic infrastructure;

sustain current, and develop new, approaches for responding to a changing climate, and adapt to the challenges of coastal erosion, permafrost melt, and ocean acidification;

encourage industrial and technological innovation in the private and academic sectors that focuses on emerging opportunities and challenges;

maintain a strong, sustainable fisheries industry and increase fisheries research and monitoring;

continue to prepare the residents of the state for emerging economic activities by using multiple education and training opportunities and implementing state workforce plans;

collaborate with all levels of government, tribes, industry, and nongovernmental organizations to achieve transparent and inclusive Arctic decision-making, including efforts to

strengthen and expand cross-border relationships and international cooperation, especially bilateral engagements with Canada and Russia;

sustain and enhance state participation in the Arctic Council;

pursue opportunities to participate meaningfully as a partner in the development of federal and international Arctic policies, thereby incorporating state and local knowledge and expertise;

strengthen support for and collaboration with Arctic Council Permanent Participant organizations that include indigenous peoples of the state;

enhance the security of the Arctic region of the state and, thereby, the security of the entire state, including efforts to

enhance disaster and emergency prevention and response, oil spill prevention and response, and search and rescue capabilities in the region;

provide safe, secure, and reliable maritime transportation in the areas of the state adjacent to the Arctic;

sustain current, and develop new, community, response, and resource-related infrastructure;

coordinate with the federal government for an increase in United States Coast Guard presence, national defense obligations, and levels of public and private sector support; and

value and strengthen the resilience of communities and respect and integrate the culture, language, and knowledge of Arctic peoples, including efforts to

recognize Arctic indigenous peoples’ cultures and unique relationship to the environment, including traditional reliance on a subsistence way of life for food security, which provides a spiritual connection to the land and the sea;

build capacity to conduct science and research and advance innovation and technology in part by providing support to the University of Alaska for Arctic research consistent with state priorities;

employ integrated, strategic planning that considers scientific, local, and traditional knowledge;

safeguard the fish, wildlife, and environment of the Arctic for the benefit of residents of the state;

encourage more effective integration of local and traditional knowledge into conventional science and research.

It is important to the state, as it relates to the Arctic, to support the strategic recommendations of the implementation plan developed by the Alaska Arctic Policy Commission and to encourage consideration of recommendations developed by the Alaska Arctic Policy Commission. Priority lines of effort for the Arctic policy of the state include

promoting economic and resource development;

addressing the infrastructure and response capacity gap in order to support the Arctic region;

supporting healthy communities; and

supporting existing and fostering new science and research that aligns with state priorities for the Arctic.

In this section, “Arctic” means the area of the state north of the Arctic Circle, north and west of the boundary formed by the Porcupine, Yukon, and Kuskokwim Rivers, all contiguous seas, including the Arctic Ocean, and the Beaufort, Bering, and Chukchi Seas, and the Aleutian Chain, except that, for the purpose of international Arctic policy, “Arctic” means the entirety of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent for this section, see sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 10, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on August 9, 2015.

Sec. 44.99.110.
Declaration of state mineral policy.

The legislature, acting under art. VIII, sec. 1 of the Constitution of the State of Alaska, in an effort to further the economic development of the state, to maintain a sound economy and stable employment, and to encourage responsible economic development within the state for the benefit of present and future generations through the proper conservation and development of the abundant mineral resources within the state, including metals, industrial minerals, and coal, declares as the mineral policy of the state that

mineral exploration and development be given fair and equitable consideration with other resource uses in the multiple use management of state land;

mineral development be encouraged through reasonable and consistent nonduplicative regulations and administrative stipulations;

mineral development and the entry into the market place of mineral products be considered in developing a statewide transportation infrastructure system;

mineral development be encouraged through appropriate public information and education, scientific research, technical studies, and University of Alaska program involvement;

economic development with respect to the state mineral industry be encouraged with Pacific Rim nations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1988)

Sec. 44.99.115.
Declaration of state energy policy.

The State of Alaska recognizes that the state’s economic prosperity is dependent on available, reliable, and affordable residential, commercial, and industrial energy to supply the state’s electric, heating, and transportation needs. The state also recognizes that worldwide supply and demand for fossil fuels and concerns about global climate change will affect the price of fossil fuels consumed by Alaskans and exported from the state to other markets. In establishing a state energy policy, the state further recognizes the immense diversity of the state’s geography, cultures, and resource availability. Therefore, it is the policy of the state to

institute a comprehensive and coordinated approach to supporting energy efficiency and conservation by

encouraging statewide energy efficiency codes for new and renovated residential, commercial, and public buildings;

decreasing public building energy consumption through conservation measures and energy-efficient technologies; and

initiating and supporting a program to educate state residents on the benefits of energy efficiency and conservation, including dissemination of information on state and federal programs that reward energy efficiency;

encourage economic development by

promoting the development of renewable and alternative energy resources, including geothermal, wind, solar, hydroelectric, hydrokinetic, tidal, and biomass energy, for use by Alaskans;

promoting the development, transport, and efficient use of nonrenewable and alternative energy resources, including natural gas, coal, oil, gas hydrates, heavy oil, and nuclear energy, for use by Alaskans and for export;

working to identify and assist with development of the most cost-effective, long-term sources of energy for each community statewide;

creating and maintaining a state fiscal regime and permitting and regulatory processes that encourage private sector development of the state’s energy resources; and

promoting the efficiency of energy used for transportation;

support energy research, education, and workforce development by investing in

training and education programs that will help create jobs for Alaskans and that address energy conservation, efficiency, and availability, including programs that address workforce development and workforce transition; and

applied energy research and development of alternative and emerging technologies, including university programs, to achieve reductions in state energy costs and stimulate industry investment in the state;

coordinate governmental functions

by reviewing and streamlining regulatory processes and balancing the economic costs of review with the level of regulation necessary to protect the public interest;

by using one office or agency, as may be specified by law, to serve as a clearinghouse in managing the state’s energy-related functions to avoid fragmentation and duplication and to increase effectiveness; and

by actively collaborating with federal agencies to achieve the state’s energy goals and to meet emissions, renewable and alternative energy, and energy production targets.

History.

(§ 2 ch 82 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent related to implementation of state energy policy, see § 1, ch. 82, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.99.120.
Declaration of nuclear freeze policy.

It is the policy of the State of Alaska

to recognize that the greatest challenge facing the earth is to prevent the occurrence of nuclear war by accident or design;

to recognize that the nuclear arms race is dangerously increasing the risk of a holocaust that would be humanity’s final war;

to promote a mutual and verifiable freeze followed by reductions in nuclear warheads, missiles, and other delivery systems in order to halt the nuclear arms race and to reduce the risk of nuclear war.

History.

(1986 Initiative Proposal No. 1, § 1)

Sec. 44.99.125.
Implementation of policy.

The governor shall conduct the affairs of state and carry out state programs in conformity with this policy.

The lieutenant governor shall deliver copies of this Act to Congress and the President of the United States.

History.

(1986 Initiative Proposal No. 1, § 2)